Maine, session 132, LD1461.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6558 is enacted to read:
§6558. Prohibition on mask mandates
1. Mask mandate; definition. As used in this section, "mask mandate" means any
requirement imposed by a school board requiring the wearing of a medical or nonmedical
face mask by a student, staff member or visitor within a school facility or during a school-
related activity.
2. Prohibition. A school board may not implement or enforce a policy that requires a
school administrative unit to adopt a mask mandate.
3. Enforcement. The department shall oversee the compliance of the provisions of
this section and ensure that school boards adhere to the prohibition under this section.
4. Penalties. A school board that violates this section is subject to penalties as
determined by the department, which may include the withholding of state funds allocated
to the school administrative unit that the school board governs.